Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.193

Community service—Policy—Incentive.

By September 1, 2013, each school district shall adopt a policy that is supportive of community service and provides an incentive, such as recognition or credit, for students who participate in community service.

[ 2013 c 176 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2013 c 176: "The legislature finds that volunteering connects students to their communities and provides an opportunity for students to practice and apply their academic and social skills in preparation for entering the workforce. Community service can better prepare and inspire students to continue their education beyond high school. Community service is also associated with increased civic awareness and participation by students." [ 2013 c 176 s 1.]